Wisconsin, session 2025, SB9.
do enact as follows:SB9,11Section 1. 341.14 (6r) (b) 23. of the statutes is created to read:SB9,2,142341.14 (6r) (b) 23. In addition to the fee under subd. 2., a voluntary payment 3of $25 shall be collected in connection with the issuance or renewal of a plate issued 4on an annual basis for the special group specified under par. (f) 70. In addition to 5the fee under subd. 2., a voluntary payment of $50 shall be collected in connection 6with the issuance or renewal of a plate issued on a biennial basis for the special 7group specified under par. (f) 70. if the plate is issued or renewed during the first 8year of the biennial registration period or $25 for the issuance or renewal if the 9plate is issued or renewed during the 2nd year of the biennial registration period. 10No plate may be issued for the special group specified under par. (f) 70. unless the 11voluntary payment under this subdivision is collected. All moneys received under 12this subdivision, in excess of $23,700 or the actual initial costs of production for the 13special group plates under par. (f) 70., whichever is less, shall be deposited in the 14transportation fund.SB9,215Section 2. 341.14 (6r) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB9,2,1916341.14 (6r) (cm) Notwithstanding par. (c), special group plates issued under 17par. (f) 70. shall have a black background and white lettering displaying the word 18“Wisconsin” and identifying letters or numbers or both, not exceeding 7 positions 19and not less than one position.SB9,320Section 3. 341.14 (6r) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB9,3,171341.14 (6r) (e) The department shall specify one combination of colors for 2special group plates for groups or organizations which are not military in nature 3and not special group plates under par. (f) 35. to 47., 50., and, 59., and 70., for each 4professional football team under par. (f) 55., for each professional baseball team 5under par. (f) 60., and for each professional basketball team under par. (f) 65. The 6department shall specify one combination of colors for special group plates under 7par. (f) 35. to 47. Subject to par. (c), the department shall specify the word or words 8comprising the special group name and the symbol to be displayed upon special 9group plates for a group or organization which is not military in nature after 10consultation with the chief executive officer in this state of the group or 11organization. The department shall require that the word or words and symbol for 12a university specified under par. (f) 35. to 47. be a registration decal or tag and 13affixed to the special group plate and be of the colors for a university specified 14under par. (f) 35. to 47. that the president of the University of Wisconsin System 15specifies. The department shall consult the chief trademark officer of Harley-16Davidson Michigan, LLC before specifying the colors for the special group plate 17under par. (f) 61r.SB9,418Section 4. 341.14 (6r) (f) 70. of the statutes is created to read:SB9,3,2019341.14 (6r) (f) 70. Persons interested in obtaining registration plates with 20white lettering on a black background.SB9,521Section 5. 341.14 (6r) (fm) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB9,4,522341.14 (6r) (fm) 7. After October 1, 1998, additional authorized special groups 23may only be special groups designated by the department under this paragraph. 1The authorized special groups enumerated in par. (f) shall be limited solely to those 2special groups specified under par. (f) on October 1, 1998. This subdivision does not 3apply to the special groups specified under par. (f) 3m., 6m., 9g., 9m., 12g., 12m., 415m., 15n., 15o., 15p., 15q., 19m., 33m., 48m., 49d., 49h., 49s., 54., 55., 55m., 56., 557., 58., 59., 60., 61., 61m., 61r., 62., 63., 64., 65., 65m., 66., 67., 68., and 69., and 70.SB9,4,66